California, session 20252026, AB623.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4123.9 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 4123.8, to read:4123.9. (a) On or before January 1, 2028, the Natural Resources Agency and the California Environmental Protection Agency shall, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, each report to the Legislature on the implementation of the proclamation of a state of emergency issued by Governor Gavin Newsom on March 1, 2025, that suspends applicable state statutes, rules, regulations, and requirements that fall within the jurisdiction of boards, departments, and offices within the California Environmental Protection Agency or the Natural Resources Agency to the extent necessary for expediting critical fuels reduction projects. The report from each of those agencies shall contain all of the following information:(1) A list of all entities that requested the secretary of the reporting agency to make a determination that the requested activity is eligible for the suspension as a critical fuels reduction project under the proclamation.(2) A list of all entities that used the suspension provided under the proclamation by either reporting agency or both reporting agencies after the reporting agency made the determination on eligibility for the suspension.(3) Detailed information on the projects of each entity for which the suspension was provided, including location, treatment, and acreage.(4) Information on how the project for which suspension was provided advances the state’s wildfire mitigation and forest health treatment goals.(5) Information about instances in which any project for which suspension was provided failed to comply with the 2020 Statewide Fires–Environmental Protection Plan and to what extent the noncompliance is known.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 30618 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 30617, to read:30618. (a) On or before January 1, 2028, the commission shall, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, report to the Legislature all of the following information: (1) The number of coastal development permit applications for fuel modification or reduction projects received annually by the commission from January 1, 2020, to December 31, 2026, inclusive, including, to the extent this information is available to the commission, both of the following:(A) The number of applications for fuel modification or reductions projects that were approved or denied.(B) The number of notices received from local governments with certified local coastal programs pursuant to Section 30603 for coastal development permit applications for fuel modification or reduction projects that the applicant acted upon.(2) The acreage of fuel modification or reduction projects approved annually under coastal development permits from January 1, 2020, to December 31, 2026, inclusive.(3) The average time annually, from January 1, 2020, to December 31, 2026, inclusive, for a coastal development permit to be approved by the commission for a fuel modification or reduction project after submission of a complete coastal development permit application. (4) The number of fuel modification or reduction projects requested under a public works plan from January 1, 2020, to December 31, 2026, inclusive. (5) The average time annually, from January 1, 2020, to December 31, 2026, inclusive, for the commission to approve a fuel modification or reduction project under a public works plan. (b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SECTION 1.Section 21080.08 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.08.Except as specified in Section 4799.05, this division does not apply to a fuel modification project to maintain defensible space of 500 feet from each side and from the front and rear of a building or structure or a fuel reduction project to prevent and contain the spread of wildfires.SEC. 2.Section 21080.36 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.36.This division does not apply to an electrical grid resilience or hardening project.SEC. 3.Section 30600 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30600.(a)Except as provided in subdivision (e), and in addition to obtaining any other permit required by law from a local government or from a state, regional, or local agency, a person, as defined in Section 21066, wishing to perform or undertake any development in the coastal zone, other than a facility subject to Section 25500, shall obtain a coastal development permit.(b)(1)Before certification of its local coastal program, a local government may, with respect to any development within its area of jurisdiction in the coastal zone and consistent with Sections 30604, 30620, and 30620.5, establish procedures for the filing, processing, review, modification, approval, or denial of a coastal development permit. Those procedures may be incorporated and made a part of the procedures relating to any other appropriate land use development permit issued by the local government.(2)A coastal development permit from a local government shall not be required by this subdivision for a development on tidelands, submerged lands, or on public trust lands, whether filled or unfilled, or for a development by a public agency for which a local government permit is not otherwise required.(c)If before certification of its local coastal program, a local government does not exercise the option provided in subdivision (b), or a development is not subject to the requirements of subdivision (b), a coastal development permit shall be obtained from the commission or from a local government as provided in subdivision (d).(d)After certification of its local coastal program or pursuant to Section 30600.5, a coastal development permit shall be obtained from the local government as provided for in Section 30519 or Section 30600.5.(e)This section does not apply to any of the following projects, except that notification by the agency or public utility performing any of the following projects shall be made to the commission within 14 days from the date of the commencement of the project:(1)Immediate emergency work necessary to protect life or property or immediate emergency repairs to public service facilities necessary to maintain service as a result of a disaster in a disaster-stricken area in which a state of emergency has been proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(2)Emergency projects undertaken, carried out, or approved by a public agency to maintain, repair, or restore an existing highway, as defined in Section 360 of the Vehicle Code, except for a highway designated as an official state scenic highway pursuant to Section 262 of the Streets and Highways Code, within the existing right-of-way of the highway, damaged as a result of fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide, within one year of the damage. This paragraph does not exempt from this section a project undertaken, carried out, or approved by a public agency to expand or widen a highway damaged by fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide.(3)A fuel modification project to maintain defensible space of 500 feet from each side and from the front and rear of a building or structure.(4)A fuel reduction project to prevent and contain the spread of wildfires.SEC. 4.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.